src/morphology/affixes/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON ADV_ !!= * @CODE@ adverbs
+Adv+Comp:%>рак K  ;
+Adv+Weak:%>ла K  ;
+Adv: K ;

!LEXICON ADV2_  ! Adverbs that take PX
!+Adv+PxSg1:%>Е2м   K ;
!+Adv+PxSg2:%>Е2т K ;

!+Adv+PxSg3:%>ыж K ; !NB_PX_CX Only after ш see twolc
!+Adv+PxSg3:%>ыжЫ2 K ; !NB_PX_CX Only after ш see twolc
!+Adv+PxSg3:%>жЫ2 K ; !NB_PX_CX
!+Adv+PxSg3:%>ж K ; !NB_PX_CX

!+Adv+PxPl1:%>на K ;
!+Adv+PxPl2:%>да K ;
!+Adv+PxPl3:%>Ы1шт K ;
!+Adv+Comp:%>рак K  ;
!+Adv+Weak:%>ла K  ;
!+Adv: K ;
