src/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
LEXICON adverbs
азаплын+Adv:аза•плын ADV_  "" ;
активне+Adv:акти•вн%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
ала-кунам+Adv:ала•-куна•м ADV_  "" ;
ала-могудеште+Adv:ала•-могуде•шт%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
али+Adv:али ADV_  "" ;
амалдымын+Adv:ама•лдымын ADV_  "" ;
арви-сурви+Adv:арви•-сурви• ADV_  "" ;
артык+Hom3+Adv:а•ртык ADV_  "" ;
аян+Adv:ая•н ADV_  "selvästi" ;
бутак+Adv:бутак ADV_  "" ;
варалан+Adv:варала•н ADV_  "" ;
вашеш+Adv:ваше•ш ADV_  "" ;
веле+Adv:вел%{еы%} ADV_  "ainoastaan" ;
вертикальне+Adv:вертика•льн%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
вигелан+Adv:вигелан ADV_  "" ;
вийынак+Adv:вийынак ADV_  "" ;
вичкыжын+Adv:ви•чкыжын ADV_  "" ;
водно+Adv:во•дн%{оы%} ADV_  "eilen illalla" ;
водынек+Adv:водынек ADV_  "illasta (lähtien)" ;
волгата-нарынче+Adv:волгата•-на•рынч%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
волгыдынʼек+Adv:волгыдынʼе•к ADV_  "" ;
вудо-водо+Adv:вудо-вод%{оы%} ADV_  "" ;
вуйге-капге+Adv:вуйге•-капге• ADV_  "" ;
вурт-варт+Adv:вурт-варт ADV_  "" ;
выжык-важык+Adv:вы•жык-ва•жык ADV_  "" ;
вӱдйымач+Adv:вӱдйыма•чын ADV_  "" ;
вӱтамбалым+Adv:вӱтамба•лым ADV_  "" ;
графически+Adv:графи•чески ADV_  "" ;
долой+Adv:долой ADV_  "alas" ;
жапгыч-жапын+Adv:жапгыч-жапын ADV_  "" ;
игечын+Adv:иге•чын ADV_  "" ;
изинʼек+Adv:изинʼе•к ADV_  "" ;
иканат+Adv:икана•т ADV_  "" ;
икмочол+Adv:икмочо•л ADV_  "" ;
иктаж-годым+Adv:икта•ж-го•дым ADV_  "" ;
иктак+Adv:икта•к ADV_  "" ;
иктынʼек+Adv:иктынʼе•к ADV_  "" ;
илен-толын+Adv:иле•н-то•лын ADV_  "ajan mittaan/tullen" ;
интерактивне+Adv+Err/Orth:интеракти•вн%{оы%} ADV_  "" ;
йогын+Adv:йо•гын ADV_  "" ;
йолге-кидге+Adv:йолге•-кидге• ADV_  "" ;
йорамал+Adv:йорамал ADV_  "" ;
йошкаргымеш+Adv:йошкаргыме•шк%{еы%} ADV_  "punaiseksi" ;
йошткыдын+Adv:йо•шткыдын ADV_  "" ;
йоҥыжмаш+Adv:йоҥыжмаш ADV_  "väärin" ;
йыдалйола+Adv:йыдалйола• ADV_  "" ;
йымак+Adv:йыма•к%{еы%} ADV_  "alle" ;
йырве-йырве+Adv:йырве-йырв%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
йыргешкын+Adv:йырге•шкын ADV_  "" ;
йыҥчак+Adv:йыҥча•к ADV_  "" ;
йӧре-варе+Adv:йӧре•-варе• ADV_  "" ;
йӱд-касвек+Adv:йӱд-касве•к%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
йӱд-эрвелнысе+Adv:йӱд-эрве•лныс%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
йӱдвел-касвелыш+Adv:йӱдве•л-касве•лыш ADV_  "" ;
йӱдвел-эрвеч+Adv:йӱдве•л-эрве•чын ADV_  "" ;
йӱдет-кечет+Adv:йӱде•т-кече•т ADV_  "" ;
йӱдйымал-эрвелан+Adv:йӱдйыма•л-эрвела•н ADV_  "" ;
йӱдшӧ-кечыже+Adv:йӱ•дшӧ-ке•чыж%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
йӱшывуя+Adv:йӱшывуя• ADV_  "" ;
казыр+Adv:ка•зыр ADV_  "pikapikaa" ;
кандалгын-сурын+Adv:канда•лгын-су•рын ADV_  "" ;
кандын-симсын+Adv:ка•ндын-си•мсын ADV_  "" ;
картла+Adv:картла• ADV_  "" ;
кас-кечывалвек+Adv:кас-кечывалве•к ADV_  "" ;
касвел-йӱдвелан+Adv:касве•л-йӱдвела•н ADV_  "" ;
касвел-кечывалвелыш+Adv:касве•л-кечывалве•лышк%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
кастен+Adv:касте•н%{еы%} ADV_  "illalla" ;
кезыле+Adv:кезыл%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
керек-кунамат+Adv:кере•к-кунамат ADV_  "" ;
кершок+Adv:кершок ADV_  "" ;
кеч-молан+Adv:кеч-мола•н ADV_  "" ;
кечывал-касвелыште+Adv:кечыва•л-касве•лышт%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
кечывалвек+Adv:кечывалве•к%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
кечывалвел-эрвелке+Adv:кечывалве•л-эрве•лк%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
кечывалвеч+Adv:кечывалве•ч ADV_  "" ;
кечын-кечын+Adv:ке•чын-ке•чын ADV_  "päivästä toiseen" ;
кидпалан+Adv:кидпала•н ADV_  "" ;
ковыжге+Adv:ко•выжге ADV_  "" ;
кожмакын+Adv:кожма•кын ADV_  "" ;
коклаш+Adv:кокла•ш ADV_  "väliin" ;
колымешке+Adv:колыме•шк%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
конкретне+Adv+Err/Orth:конкре•тн%{оы%} ADV_  "konkreettisesti" ;
корембач+Adv:коремба•чын ADV_  "" ;
корштарен+Adv:корштаре•н ADV_  "" ;
кочын+Adv:ко•чын ADV_  "" ;
коштыр-р+Adv:кошты•р-р ADV_  "" ;
коҥгаончылан+Adv:коҥгаончыла•н ADV_  "" ;
коҥгок+Adv:коҥгок ADV_  "" ;
куаналын+Adv:куана•лын ADV_  "" ;
кувелне+Adv:куве•лн%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
кугунлан+Adv:кугу•нлан ADV_  "" ;
кужеш+Adv:куже•ш ADV_  "" ;
кузе-кузе+Adv:кузе•-кузе• ADV_  "" ;
кумшешым+Adv:кумше•шымын ADV_  "kolmantena päivänä" ;
кумынек+Adv:кумынек ADV_  "" ;
кунар+Adv:куна•р%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
курымешлан+Adv:курымешла•н ADV_  "ainiaaksi" ;
куш+Adv:ку•ш ADV_  "" ;
кушкыж+Adv:ку•шкыж ADV_  "" ;
кыдач-покшеч+Adv:кыда•ч-покше•ч ADV_  "" ;
кылдырым-кылдырым+Adv:кы•лдырым-кылдырым ADV_  "" ;
кынелдымын+Adv:кынелдымын ADV_  "" ;
кычкырен-кычкырен+Adv:кычкыре•н-кычкыре•н ADV_  "huutaen; huutamisen takia" ;
кӧнышын+Adv:кӧ•нышын ADV_  "" ;
кӱварвалым+Adv:кӱварва•лым ADV_  "" ;
кӱкшын-кӱкшын+Adv:кӱ•кшын-кӱ•кшын ADV_  "" ;
кӱренын+Adv:кӱре•нын ADV_  "" ;
кӱчымын+Adv:кӱ•чымын ADV_  "" ;
лайгатан+Adv:лайгата•н ADV_  "" ;
лапчык-лапчык+Adv:ла•пчык-ла•пчык ADV_  "" ;
леведышде+Adv:леведышде• ADV_  "" ;
ломдыкын+Adv:ло•мдыкын ADV_  "" ;
лугыч+Adv:лу•гычын ADV_  "keskeyttämättä" ;
лыдыр+Adv:лы•дыр ADV_  "" ;
лыптрок+Adv:лыптро•к ADV_  "" ;
льыптырт+Adv:льыптырт ADV_  "" ;
лӱдын+Adv:лӱ•дын ADV_  "pelokkaasti" ;
марке+Adv:марк%{еы%} ADV_  "asti; ennen" ;
модын-воштыл+Adv:мо•дын-во•штылын ADV_  "telmien" ;
мугыльдик+Adv:мугыльди•к ADV_  "" ;
мыгыль-мугыль+Adv:мы•гыль-му•гыль ADV_  "(deskr. jstak epäselvänä näkyvästä)" ;
мӧҥгешла+Adv:мӧҥгешла• ADV_  "päinvastoin" ;
наре+Adv:нар%{еы%} ADV_  "melkein" ;
немерке+Adv:неме•рк%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
нимынярлан+Adv:нʼимынярла•н ADV_  "" ;
нылымшешым+Adv:нылымше•шым ADV_  "" ;
обязательно+Adv:обязательн%{оы%} ADV_  "" ;
олачан+Adv:олача•н ADV_  "" ;
ончыктыдымашын+Adv:ончыктыдыма•шын ADV_  "" ;
оралгышын+Adv:ора•лгышын ADV_  "" ;
очыниеш+Adv:очыниеш ADV_  "" ;
ошын-сарын+Adv:о•шын-са•рын ADV_  "" ;
падырашын+Adv:падыра•шын ADV_  "" ;
пел-могырым+Adv:пел-могырым ADV_  "" ;
пелыгыч+Adv:пе•лыгычын ADV_  "kahtia" ;
пич+Adv:пич ADV_  "umpeen" ;
помыжалтде+Adv:помыжалтде• ADV_  "(kertaakaan) heräämättä" ;
просто+Adv:про•ст%{оы%} ADV_  "" ;
пыз-пыз+Adv:пыз-пыз ADV_  "" ;
пычырик+Adv:пычыри•к ADV_  "vähän" ;
пӱчмыла+Adv:пӱчмыла• ADV_  "" ;
рвезын+Adv:рве•зын ADV_  "" ;
рыжган+Adv:рыжган ADV_  "" ;
сайын+Adv:сайын ADV_  "hyvin" ;
сексуальне+Adv:сексуа•льн%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
ситышын+Adv:си•тышын ADV_  "tarpeeksi" ;
соталгын+Adv:сота•лгын ADV_  "" ;
схематичне+Adv:схемати•чн%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
сӧрвалышын+Adv:сӧрва•лышын ADV_  "" ;
тап+Hom1+Adv:тап ADV_  "" ;
тегакше+Adv:тега•кш%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
теньыш+Adv:те•ньыш ADV_  "tännemmä(s)" ;
титакде+Adv:титакде• ADV_  "" ;
толдымашлык+Adv:толдыма•шлык ADV_  "" ;
тормакын+Adv:торма•кын ADV_  "" ;
тувелыш+Adv:туве•лышк%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
тукымсыр+Adv:тукымсыр ADV_  "ajattelematta" ;
тупе-ваше+Adv:тупе•-ваше• ADV_  "seläkkäin" ;
тутышын+Adv:ту•тышын ADV_  "" ;
тывелан+Adv:тывела•н ADV_  "tuolla suunnalla" ;
тыгутлаште+Adv:тыгутла•шт%{еы%} ADV_  "tähän aikaan" ;
тынар+Adv:тына•р%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
тышан-тушан+Adv:тыша•н-туша•н ADV_  "" ;
тӧвалам+Adv:тӧвалам ADV_  "" ;
тӱжвак+Adv:тӱжва•к ADV_  "ulos" ;
тӱнямбалне+Adv:тӱнямба•лн%{еы%} ADV_  "(kaikkialla) maailmassa" ;
тӱчанʼек+Adv:тӱчанʼе•к ADV_  "" ;
ужар-олан+Adv:ужа•р-ола•н ADV_  "" ;
укеш+Adv:укеш ADV_  "" ;
уналыкеш+Adv:уналыке•ш ADV_  "vieraisille" ;
утыген-утыген+Adv:утыге•н-утыге•н ADV_  "" ;
хо-хо-хо+Adv:хо-хо-х%{оы%} ADV_  "" ;
чарамат+Adv:чарамат ADV_  "" ;
чеверын-моторын+Adv:чеве•рын-мото•рын ADV_  "" ;
чож-ж+Adv:чож-ж ADV_  "" ;
чорик+Adv:чори•к ADV_  "" ;
чуйге+Adv:чу•йг%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
чуҥге+Adv:чу•ҥг%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
чынек+Adv:чынек ADV_  "" ;
чӱч+Adv:чӱч ADV_  "" ;
шапалгын-кандын+Adv:шапа•лгын-ка•ндын ADV_  "" ;
шемалге-чеверын+Adv:шема•лге-чеверын ADV_  "" ;
шеҥгек-ончык+Adv:шеҥге•к-о•нчык ADV_  "edestakaisin" ;
шикшын-пушын+Adv:ши•кшын-пу•шын ADV_  "" ;
шовыге+Adv:шо•выг%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
шокшывелым+Adv:шокшыве•лым ADV_  "" ;
шонен-висен+Adv:шоне•н-висе•н ADV_  "" ;
шочынжо+Adv:шо•чынж%{оы%} ADV_  "" ;
шуко-шуко+Adv:шу•ко-шу•к%{оы%} ADV_  "" ;
шыдешкен+Adv:шыдешке•н ADV_  "" ;
шып-тымык+Adv:шып-ты•мык ADV_  "" ;
шыҥ+Adv:шыҥ ADV_  "" ;
шӱкшын+Adv:шӱ•кшын ADV_  "" ;
элыксыр+Adv:э•лыксыр ADV_  "" ;
эрак+Adv:э•рак ADV_  "" ;
эрвелыш+Adv:эрве•лышк%{еы%} ADV_  "" ;
эркын-эркын+Adv:э•ркын-э•ркын ADV_  "pikkuhiljaa; hyvin hitaasti" ;
эшеат+Adv:эшеат ADV_  "" ;
юлт+Adv:юлт ADV_  "" ;
юридически+Adv:юриди•чески ADV_  "" ;
ямысыр+Adv:я•мысыр ADV_  "" ;
ӧлтын-ӧлтын+Adv:ӧ•лтын-ӧ•лтын ADV_  "" ;
ӱвыре+Adv:ӱвыре• ADV_  "olla sokkosilla" ;
ӱмаште+Adv:ӱма•шт%{еы%} ADV_  "viime/edellisvuonna" ;
ӱшандарен+Adv:ӱшандаре•н ADV_  "vakuuttaen; vakuuttavasti" ;
